Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5953YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2235 Section 1. Section 256.146, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 3 establishing authorizations for instruction related to fine 4 arts in schools providing instruction to students enrolled in 5 prekindergarten through grade twelve, including art, music, and 6 choir. 7